Oklahoma, session 2025, SB991.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1911 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State of Oklahoma hereby adopts the non-legally binding
Working Definition of Anti-Semitism adopted by the International
Holocaust Remembrance Alliance (IHRA) on May 26, 2016, including the
contemporary examples of anti-Semitism set forth therein,
exclusively as a tool and guide for training, education, and
recognizing and combating anti-Semitic hate crimes or discrimination
and for tracking and reporting anti-Semitic incidents in this state.
B. The provisions of this act shall not be construed to
diminish or infringe upon any right protected under the First
Amendment to the United States Constitution or the Oklahoma
Constitution.

Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 991 Page 2